ani_nouns_lexicon.lexd
адаб                                                        # уважение
ала                                                         # этаж
алам                                                        # толпа
аракъи                                                      # водка
асар                                                        # впечатление
ахъи                                                        # печь
бакки                                                       # внимание
батIалъир                                                   # разница
баъир                                                       # чтение
бехумугъул                                                  # курдюк
вино                                                        # вино
гIаламати                                                   # чудо
гIалам                                                      # толпа
гIахълулъай                                                 # воспитание
гага                                                        # косточка
газ                                                         # газ
гама                                                        # половник
гун                                                         # толокно
гъа                                                         # фундамент
гъалай                                                      # олово
гъалмагъар                                                  # ссора
гъогъу                                                      # щебень
гьава                                                       # воздух
гьанъо                                                      # пот
гьатIи                                                      # тесто
гьинцIцIу                                                   # гумно
гьоъор                                                      # пол
джахIда                                                     # зависть
джуджахIи                                                   # ад
дин                                                         # вера
заман                                                       # время
зигара                                                      # соболезнование
зигара                                                      # стон
йахI                                                        # честь
йези                                                        # бронза
ккуб                                                        # железо
къай                                                        # ноша
къанцIи                                                     # уксус
къара                                                       # перхоть
къеча                                                       # тайна
къири                                                       # пшеница
кIвагьаллъир                                                # лень
лIибдир                                                     # танец
лъал                                                        # полдень
магIишати                                                   # хозяйство
мисал                                                       # пример
мисиди                                                      # золото
онщи                                                        # земля
орси                                                        # серебро
орси                                                        # деньги
пулав                                                       # плов
пурч                                                        # перец
ражи                                                        # чеснок
разилъир                                                    # согласие
рахор                                                       # борьба
реси                                                        # моль
ригьи                                                       # время
ришвати                                                     # взятка
ситIа                                                       # солома
ссирдир                                                     # страх
суда                                                        # сода
сур                                                         # песок
тавхан                                                      # уличная печь для хлеба
такъийа                                                     # головной убор
удилъир                                                     # глубина
хIавла                                                      # халва
хабар                                                       # весть
хабар                                                       # рассказ
хайген                                                      # яичница
хъала                                                       # этаж
хъал                                                        # скорлупа
хъал                                                        # кожа
хъал                                                        # корка
цIцIикъу                                                    # иней
цIцIума                                                     # камыш
чIир                                                        # порох
чIори                                                       # рожь
чиллай                                                      # шелк
чирон                                                       # сталь
чорпа                                                       # суп
шанкьаннир                                                  # дыхание
шаръи                                                       # шариат
щиб                                                         # роса
шулибол                                                     # кладбище
ширшири                                                     # шорох
реххула                                                     # длина
рецци                                                       # добро
ишан                                                        # прицел
изну                                                        # разрешение
мишу                                                        # сбор
хIал                                                        # состояние
тахшагьар                                                   # столица
бишилъир                                                    # толщина
вабаъи                                                      # холера
гьокIорулъир                                                # вес
реси                                                        # имущество
йоргъа                                                      # иноходь
хал.ъи                                                      # народ
йахIнамуси                                                  # совесть
абур                                                        # грудь
авъара                                                      # шапка
адат                                                        # обычай
айиб                                                        # вина
алахи                                                       # пастбище
алахи                                                       # кутан
амал                                                        # характер
амру                                                        # приказ
анччу                                                       # тень
арада                                                       # пушка
арзи                                                        # жалоба
арзи                                                        # заявление
арком                                                       # ложка
аскIар                                                      # войско
аскIар                                                      # армия
аста                                                        # сноп
ахъи                                                        # очаг
ахъу                                                        # бедро
ахъу                                                        # ляжка
ахьал                                                       # половина
багин                                                       # нора
багин                                                       # дыра
багьа                                                       # цена
багьанна                                                    # причина
байдан                                                      # равнина
балкан                                                      # падаль
башлухъи                                                    # башлык
бегъва                                                      # сеновал
бежун                                                       # игла
бекьи                                                       # хлев
бел                                                         # лопата
бертин                                                      # свадьба
бертин                                                      # брак
бесун                                                       # нож
бехун                                                       # плечо
беххиркъил                                                  # ягодица
бешен                                                       # гнездо
бешен                                                       # постель
бешен                                                       # матрац
бил                                                         # гора
битон                                                       # бидон
бишо                                                        # шуба
бошицIцIекIа                                                # мизинец
буги                                                        # пища
буртина                                                     # бурка
бурчIина                                                    # ячмень
васийат                                                     # завещание
ватIан                                                      # родина
ваъаза                                                      # проповедь
газа                                                        # кирка
гали                                                        # шаг
гару                                                        # шея
гару                                                        # воротник
гачи                                                        # известь
гверзу                                                      # щека
гел                                                         # сковорода
гелчи                                                       # паутина
гидал                                                       # игра
гиза                                                        # корзина
гимура                                                      # бублик
гожо                                                        # клык
гудур                                                       # капкан
гулла                                                       # пуля
гурушка                                                     # кружка
гъадара                                                     # тарелка
гъадил                                                      # загон
гъадукIол                                                   # пень
гъа                                                         # вымя
гъалатIи                                                    # ошибка
гъалир                                                      # калитка
гъан                                                        # хлеб
гъвен                                                       # жало
гъижи                                                       # холм
гъузи                                                       # грязь
гъун                                                        # куча
